Utah statutes.
70A-3-202.   Negotiation subject to rescission.
(1)  Negotiation is effective even if obtained from an infant, a corporation
exceeding its powers, a person without capacity, by fraud, duress, or mistake,
or in breach of duty or as part of an illegal transaction.
(2)  To the extent permitted by other law, negotiation may be rescinded or may
be subject to other remedies, but those remedies may not be asserted against a
subsequent holder in due course or a person paying the instrument in good
faith and without knowledge of facts that are a basis for rescission or other
remedy.
